lexd/ru_lemmas/v.lexd
LEXICON RuLemmasV
абêзд<v>:глотать<v>
абêх̌тоw<v>:глотать<v>
абоз<v>:глотать<v>
абох̌т<v>:глотать<v>
абох̌ч<v>:глотать<v>
абêзд<v>:затягиваться<v>
абêх̌тоw<v>:затягиваться<v>
абоз<v>:затягиваться<v>
абох̌т<v>:затягиваться<v>
абох̌ч<v>:затягиваться<v>
аw<v>:плакать<v>
аwд<v>:плакать<v>
аwт<v>:плакать<v>
аwтоw<v>:плакать<v>
аwч<v>:плакать<v>
ҳаw<v>:плакать<v>
ҳаwд<v>:плакать<v>
аwез<v>:вешать<v>
аwезд<v>:вешать<v>
аwездоw<v>:вешать<v>
аwезҷ<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡ<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡд<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡдоw<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡҷ<v>:вешать<v>
аwез<v>:вешать<v>
аwезд<v>:вешать<v>
аwездоw<v>:вешать<v>
аwезҷ<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡ<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡд<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡдоw<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡҷ<v>:вешать<v>
агāн<v>:покрывать<v>
агāнт<v>:покрывать<v>
агāнтоw<v>:покрывать<v>
агāнч<v>:покрывать<v>
ағ̌āн<v>:покрывать<v>
ағ̌āнт<v>:покрывать<v>
ағ̌āнтоw<v>:покрывать<v>
ағ̌āнч<v>:покрывать<v>
аθак<v>:тяжело_дышать<v>
аθакт<v>:тяжело_дышать<v>
аθактоw<v>:тяжело_дышать<v>
аθакч<v>:тяжело_дышать<v>
аθêр<v>:передавать<v>
аθêрт<v>:передавать<v>
аθêртоw<v>:передавать<v>
аθêрч<v>:передавать<v>
ажêр<v>:мочить<v>
ажêрт<v>:мочить<v>
ажêртоw<v>:мочить<v>
ажêрч<v>:мочить<v>
нижêр<v>:мочить<v>
нижêрт<v>:мочить<v>
нижêртоw<v>:мочить<v>
нижêрч<v>:мочить<v>
ажир<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажирт<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажиртоw<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажод<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажоғ̌ҷ<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажӣғ̌ӡ<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажӯд<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажӯйд<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажӯғ̌ҷ<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижир<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижирт<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижиртоw<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижирч<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижод<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижод<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижоғ̌ҷ<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижӣғ̌ӡ<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижӯд<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижӯғ̌ҷ<v>:мокнуть<v>
амбис<v>:обваливаться<v>
амбист<v>:обваливаться<v>
амбисч<v>:обваливаться<v>
амбӣθ<v>:обваливаться<v>
амбӣθт<v>:обваливаться<v>
амбӯст<v>:обваливаться<v>
амбӯсч<v>:обваливаться<v>
анак<v>:трудиться<v>
анакт<v>:трудиться<v>
анактоw<v>:трудиться<v>
анакч<v>:трудиться<v>
анафц<v>:мокнуть<v>
анафцт<v>:мокнуть<v>
анафцтоw<v>:мокнуть<v>
анафцч<v>:мокнуть<v>
анафц<v>:размягчаться<v>
анафцт<v>:размягчаться<v>
анафцтоw<v>:размягчаться<v>
анафцч<v>:размягчаться<v>
анафц<v>:распариться<v>
анафцт<v>:распариться<v>
анафцтоw<v>:распариться<v>
анафцч<v>:распариться<v>
анг<v>:плакать<v>
ангт<v>:плакать<v>
ангтоw<v>:плакать<v>
ангч<v>:плакать<v>
ангахт<v>:попадать<v>
ангахтоw<v>:попадать<v>
ангахц<v>:попадать<v>
ангахцт<v>:попадать<v>
ангахч<v>:попадать<v>
ангихт<v>:попадать<v>
ангихтоw<v>:попадать<v>
ангихч<v>:попадать<v>
ингахц<v>:попадать<v>
ингахцт<v>:попадать<v>
ингихт<v>:попадать<v>
ингихтоw<v>:попадать<v>
ингихч<v>:попадать<v>
йингахц<v>:попадать<v>
йингихт<v>:попадать<v>
йингихтоw<v>:попадать<v>
йингихч<v>:попадать<v>
ангахт<v>:задевать<v>
ангахтоw<v>:задевать<v>
ангахц<v>:задевать<v>
ангахцт<v>:задевать<v>
ангахч<v>:задевать<v>
ангихт<v>:задевать<v>
ангихтоw<v>:задевать<v>
ангихч<v>:задевать<v>
ингахц<v>:задевать<v>
ингахцт<v>:задевать<v>
ингихт<v>:задевать<v>
ингихтоw<v>:задевать<v>
ингихч<v>:задевать<v>
йингахц<v>:задевать<v>
йингихт<v>:задевать<v>
йингихтоw<v>:задевать<v>
йингихч<v>:задевать<v>
ангахт<v>:заикаться<v>
ангахтоw<v>:заикаться<v>
ангахц<v>:заикаться<v>
ангахцт<v>:заикаться<v>
ангахч<v>:заикаться<v>
ангихт<v>:заикаться<v>
ангихтоw<v>:заикаться<v>
ангихч<v>:заикаться<v>
ингахц<v>:заикаться<v>
ингахцт<v>:заикаться<v>
ингихт<v>:заикаться<v>
ингихтоw<v>:заикаться<v>
ингихч<v>:заикаться<v>
йингахц<v>:заикаться<v>
йингихт<v>:заикаться<v>
йингихтоw<v>:заикаться<v>
йингихч<v>:заикаться<v>
ангахт<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангахтоw<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангахц<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангахцт<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангахч<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангихт<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангихтоw<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангихч<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ингахц<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ингахцт<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ингихт<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ингихтоw<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ингихч<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
йингахц<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
йингихт<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
йингихтоw<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
йингихч<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангу̊х<v>:путать<v>
ангу̊хт<v>:путать<v>
ангу̊хтоw<v>:путать<v>
ангу̊хч<v>:путать<v>
ингу̊х<v>:путать<v>
ингу̊хт<v>:путать<v>
ингу̊хтоw<v>:путать<v>
ингу̊хч<v>:путать<v>
ангу̊х<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ангу̊хт<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ангу̊хтоw<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ангу̊хч<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ингу̊х<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ингу̊хт<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ингу̊хтоw<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ингу̊хч<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ангу̊х<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ангу̊хт<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ангу̊хтоw<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ангу̊хч<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ингу̊х<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ингу̊хт<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ингу̊хтоw<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ингу̊хч<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
андиз<v>:вставать<v>
андиӡ<v>:вставать<v>
андойд<v>:вставать<v>
андойҷ<v>:вставать<v>
андӣдоw<v>:вставать<v>
андӣзд<v>:вставать<v>
андӣц<v>:вставать<v>
андӣӡд<v>:вставать<v>
андӯйд<v>:вставать<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:вставать<v>
индиз<v>:вставать<v>
индойд<v>:вставать<v>
индойҷ<v>:вставать<v>
индӣдоw<v>:вставать<v>
индӣзд<v>:вставать<v>
индӣц<v>:вставать<v>
индӯйд<v>:вставать<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:вставать<v>
йиндиз<v>:вставать<v>
андиз<v>:вставать<v>
андиӡ<v>:вставать<v>
андойд<v>:вставать<v>
андойҷ<v>:вставать<v>
андӣдоw<v>:вставать<v>
андӣзд<v>:вставать<v>
андӣц<v>:вставать<v>
андӣӡд<v>:вставать<v>
андӯйд<v>:вставать<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:вставать<v>
индиз<v>:вставать<v>
индойд<v>:вставать<v>
индойҷ<v>:вставать<v>
индӣдоw<v>:вставать<v>
индӣзд<v>:вставать<v>
индӣц<v>:вставать<v>
индӯйд<v>:вставать<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:вставать<v>
йиндиз<v>:вставать<v>
андиз<v>:уходить<v>
андиӡ<v>:уходить<v>
андойд<v>:уходить<v>
андойҷ<v>:уходить<v>
андӣдоw<v>:уходить<v>
андӣзд<v>:уходить<v>
андӣц<v>:уходить<v>
андӣӡд<v>:уходить<v>
андӯйд<v>:уходить<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:уходить<v>
индиз<v>:уходить<v>
индойд<v>:уходить<v>
индойҷ<v>:уходить<v>
индӣдоw<v>:уходить<v>
индӣзд<v>:уходить<v>
индӣц<v>:уходить<v>
индӯйд<v>:уходить<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:уходить<v>
йиндиз<v>:уходить<v>
андиз<v>:отставать<v>
андиӡ<v>:отставать<v>
андойд<v>:отставать<v>
андойҷ<v>:отставать<v>
андӣдоw<v>:отставать<v>
андӣзд<v>:отставать<v>
андӣц<v>:отставать<v>
андӣӡд<v>:отставать<v>
андӯйд<v>:отставать<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:отставать<v>
индиз<v>:отставать<v>
индойд<v>:отставать<v>
индойҷ<v>:отставать<v>
индӣдоw<v>:отставать<v>
индӣзд<v>:отставать<v>
индӣц<v>:отставать<v>
индӯйд<v>:отставать<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:отставать<v>
йиндиз<v>:отставать<v>
андиз<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андиӡ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андойд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андойҷ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андӣдоw<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андӣзд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андӣц<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андӣӡд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андӯйд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индиз<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индойд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индойҷ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индӣдоw<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индӣзд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индӣц<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индӯйд<v>:увеличиваться<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:увеличиваться<v>
йиндиз<v>:увеличиваться<v>
андиз<v>:вырастать<v>
андиӡ<v>:вырастать<v>
андойд<v>:вырастать<v>
андойҷ<v>:вырастать<v>
андӣдоw<v>:вырастать<v>
андӣзд<v>:вырастать<v>
андӣц<v>:вырастать<v>
андӣӡд<v>:вырастать<v>
андӯйд<v>:вырастать<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:вырастать<v>
индиз<v>:вырастать<v>
индойд<v>:вырастать<v>
индойҷ<v>:вырастать<v>
индӣдоw<v>:вырастать<v>
индӣзд<v>:вырастать<v>
индӣц<v>:вырастать<v>
индӯйд<v>:вырастать<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:вырастать<v>
йиндиз<v>:вырастать<v>
андиз<v>:расти<v>
андиӡ<v>:расти<v>
андойд<v>:расти<v>
андойҷ<v>:расти<v>
андӣдоw<v>:расти<v>
андӣзд<v>:расти<v>
андӣц<v>:расти<v>
андӣӡд<v>:расти<v>
андӯйд<v>:расти<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:расти<v>
индиз<v>:расти<v>
индойд<v>:расти<v>
индойҷ<v>:расти<v>
индӣдоw<v>:расти<v>
индӣзд<v>:расти<v>
индӣц<v>:расти<v>
индӯйд<v>:расти<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:расти<v>
йиндиз<v>:расти<v>
андиз<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андиӡ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андойд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андойҷ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андӣдоw<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андӣзд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андӣц<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андӣӡд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андӯйд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индиз<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индойд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индойҷ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индӣдоw<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индӣзд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индӣц<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индӯйд<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
йиндиз<v>:продвигаться_по_службе<v>
андиз<v>:начинаться<v>
андиӡ<v>:начинаться<v>
андойд<v>:начинаться<v>
андойҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
андӣдоw<v>:начинаться<v>
андӣзд<v>:начинаться<v>
андӣц<v>:начинаться<v>
андӣӡд<v>:начинаться<v>
андӯйд<v>:начинаться<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
индиз<v>:начинаться<v>
индойд<v>:начинаться<v>
индойҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
индӣдоw<v>:начинаться<v>
индӣзд<v>:начинаться<v>
индӣц<v>:начинаться<v>
индӯйд<v>:начинаться<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
йиндиз<v>:начинаться<v>
анду̊з<v>:будить<v>
анду̊зд<v>:будить<v>
анду̊здоw<v>:будить<v>
анду̊зҷ<v>:будить<v>
инду̊з<v>:будить<v>
инду̊зд<v>:будить<v>
инду̊здоw<v>:будить<v>
инду̊зҷ<v>:будить<v>
анцāв<v>:шить<v>
анцāвен<v>:шить<v>
анцāвум<v>:шить<v>
анцāм<v>:шить<v>
анца<v>:шить<v>
анцавет<v>:шить<v>
анцен<v>:шить<v>
анцӣвд<v>:шить<v>
анцӣвдоw<v>:шить<v>
анцӯвд<v>:шить<v>
анцӯвҷ<v>:шить<v>
инцāв<v>:шить<v>
инцāвен<v>:шить<v>
инцāвум<v>:шить<v>
инцāм<v>:шить<v>
инца<v>:шить<v>
инцавет<v>:шить<v>
инцен<v>:шить<v>
инцӣвд<v>:шить<v>
инцӣвдоw<v>:шить<v>
инцӯвд<v>:шить<v>
инцӯвҷ<v>:шить<v>
анҷафц<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷафцт<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷафцтоw<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷовд<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷовҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷӣвӡ<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷафц<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷафцт<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷафцтоw<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷовд<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷовҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷӣвӡ<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:начинаться<v>
анҷāв<v>:<v>
анҷāвен<v>:<v>
анҷāвет<v>:<v>
анҷāвум<v>:<v>
анҷāм<v>:<v>
анҷа<v>:<v>
анҷен<v>:<v>
анҷет<v>:<v>
анҷӣвд<v>:<v>
анҷӣвдоw<v>:<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:<v>
инҷāв<v>:<v>
инҷāвен<v>:<v>
инҷāвет<v>:<v>
инҷāвум<v>:<v>
инҷāм<v>:<v>
инҷа<v>:<v>
инҷӣвд<v>:<v>
инҷӣвдоw<v>:<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:<v>
анҷāв<v>:ловить<v>
анҷāвен<v>:ловить<v>
анҷāвет<v>:ловить<v>
анҷāвум<v>:ловить<v>
анҷāм<v>:ловить<v>
анҷа<v>:ловить<v>
анҷен<v>:ловить<v>
анҷет<v>:ловить<v>
анҷӣвд<v>:ловить<v>
анҷӣвдоw<v>:ловить<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:ловить<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:ловить<v>
инҷāв<v>:ловить<v>
инҷāвен<v>:ловить<v>
инҷāвет<v>:ловить<v>
инҷāвум<v>:ловить<v>
инҷāм<v>:ловить<v>
инҷа<v>:ловить<v>
инҷӣвд<v>:ловить<v>
инҷӣвдоw<v>:ловить<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:ловить<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:ловить<v>
анҷāв<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷāвен<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷāвет<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷāвум<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷāм<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷа<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷен<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷет<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷӣвд<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷӣвдоw<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷāв<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷāвен<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷāвет<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷāвум<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷāм<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷа<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷӣвд<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷӣвдоw<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:задерживать<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:задерживать<v>
анҷāв<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷāвен<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷāвет<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷāвум<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷāм<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷа<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷен<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷет<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷӣвд<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷӣвдоw<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷāв<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷāвен<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷāвет<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷāвум<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷāм<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷа<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷӣвд<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷӣвдоw<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷӯвд<v>:занимать_место<v>
инҷӯвҷ<v>:занимать_место<v>
анҷāв<v>:схватить<v>
анҷāвен<v>:схватить<v>
анҷāвет<v>:схватить<v>
анҷāвум<v>:схватить<v>
анҷāм<v>:схватить<v>
анҷа<v>:схватить<v>
анҷен<v>:схватить<v>
анҷет<v>:схватить<v>
анҷӣвд<v>:схватить<v>
анҷӣвдоw<v>:схватить<v>
анҷӯвд<v>:схватить<v>
анҷӯвҷ<v>:схватить<v>
инҷāв<v>:схватить<v>
